Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 17. Foreign Corporations.
§ 13.1-767.
Withdrawal of foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth may withdraw its certificate of authority by applying to the Commission for a certificate of withdrawal. The application shall be on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commission, which shall set forth:

The name of the foreign corporation and its jurisdiction of formation;

If applicable, a statement that the foreign corporation was a party to a merger permitted by the laws of its jurisdiction of formation and that it was not the surviving entity of the merger, has consolidated with another entity, or has converted to another type of entity under the laws of its jurisdiction of formation;

That the foreign corporation is not transacting business in the Commonwealth and that it surrenders its authority to transact business in the Commonwealth;

That the foreign corporation revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service on its behalf and appoints the clerk of the Commission as an agent for service of process upon the foreign corporation in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time it was authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A mailing address to which the clerk of the Commission may mail a copy of any process served on the clerk under subdivision 4; and

A commitment to notify the clerk of the Commission in the future of any change in the mailing address of the corporation.

The Commission shall not allow any foreign corporation to withdraw its certificate of authority unless such corporation files with the Commission a statement certifying that the corporation has filed returns and has paid all state taxes to the time of the statement or a statement that no such returns are required to be filed or taxes are required to be paid. In such case the corporation may file returns and pay taxes before they would otherwise be due. If the Commission finds that the application complies with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of withdrawal.

Before any foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth terminates its corporate existence, it shall file with the Commission an application for withdrawal. Whether or not such application is filed, the termination of the corporate existence of such foreign corporation shall not take away or impair any remedy available against such corporation for any right or claim existing or any liability incurred prior to such termination. Any such action or proceeding against such foreign corporation may be defended by such corporation in its corporate name. The shareholders, directors and officers shall have power to take such corporate or other action as shall be appropriate to protect such remedy, right or claim. The right of a foreign corporation that has terminated its corporate existence to institute and maintain in its corporate name actions, suits or proceedings in the courts of the Commonwealth shall be governed by the laws of the jurisdiction of its formation.

Service of process on the clerk of the Commission is service of process on a foreign corporation that has withdrawn its certificate of authority pursuant to this section. Service upon the clerk shall be made in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

and service upon the foreign corporation may be made in any other manner permitted by law.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-211.1, 13.1-115 to 13.1-116, 13.1-118; 1956, c. 428; 1958, cc. 506, 564; 1975, cc. 88, 500; 1985, c. 522; 1991, c. 672; 1994, c. 291; 2005, c. 765; 2012, c. 130; 2015, c. 623; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” throughout; in subdivision B 4, inserted “of the Commission” and substituted “the clerk” for “him”; and in subsection E, substituted “Service upon the clerk” for “and,” deleted “upon the clerk” following “made” and inserted “and service upon the foreign corporation may be made in any other manner permitted by law.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 130, in subsection B, in the introductory paragraph, substituted “on a form” for “on forms” and “which” for “and”; added subdivision B 2; redesignated former subdivisions B 2 through B 5 as subdivisions B 3 through B 6; and substituted “subdivision 4” for “subdivision 3 of this subsection” in subdivision B 5.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 substituted “other jurisdiction” for “country” in subdivision B 1; rewrote subdivision B 2, which read “That the foreign corporation is in existence and has not been merged into or consolidated with another entity or converted into another type of entity or, if the foreign corporation has been merged into or consolidated with another entity or converted into another type of entity, that the application is signed on behalf of the foreign corporation by the surviving or resulting entity”; and inserted “or a statement no such returns are required to be filed or taxes are required to be paid” in subsection C.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote subsection A, which read: “A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth may not withdraw from the Commonwealth until it obtains a certificate of withdrawal from the Commission”; redesignated and rewrote former subsection B as part of subsection A; redesignated former subsections D through E as B through D, respectively; in subsection B, substituted “its certificate of authority” for “from the Commonwealth,” and substituted “statement” for “certificate”; in subsection C, substituted “the laws of the jurisdiction of its formation” for “the law of the state of its incorporation”; and in subsection D, inserted “its certificate of authority” following “withdrawn.”

§ 13.1-768.
Automatic revocation of certificate of authority.

If any foreign corporation fails to file its annual report or pay its annual registration fee in a timely manner as required by this chapter, the Commission shall mail to each such corporation a notice of the impending revocation of its certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth. Whether or not such notice is mailed, if any foreign corporation fails to file its annual report or pay its annual registration fee on or before the last day of the fourth month immediately following its annual report or annual registration fee due date each year, such foreign corporation shall automatically cease to be authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth and its certificate of authority shall be automatically revoked as of that day.

Every foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth shall pay the annual registration fee required by law on or before the foreign corporation’s annual registration fee due date determined in accordance with subsection A of §

13.1-775.1

of each year.

If any foreign corporation whose registered agent has filed with the Commission a statement of resignation pursuant to §

13.1-765

fails to file a statement of change pursuant to §

13.1-764

within 31 days after the date on which the statement of resignation was filed, the Commission shall mail notice to the foreign corporation of the impending revocation of its certificate of authority. If the foreign corporation fails to file the statement of change before the last day of the second month immediately following the month in which the impending revocation notice was mailed, the corporation shall automatically cease to be authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth and its certificate of authority shall be automatically revoked as of that day.

The automatic revocation of a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority pursuant to this section constitutes the appointment of the clerk of the Commission as an agent for service of process upon the foreign corporation in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time the foreign corporation was authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth. Service of process on the clerk of the Commission under this subsection is service on the foreign corporation and shall be made on the clerk in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

.

Revocation of a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority pursuant to this section does not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the corporation.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-117; 1956, c. 428; 1970, c. 4; 1980, c. 192; 1985, cc. 522, 528; 1987, c. 2; 1988, c. 405; 1991, c. 125; 1997, c. 216; 2000, c. 52; 2005, c. 765; 2010, c. 753; 2019, c. 734.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 52, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any domestic or foreign corporation, domestic or foreign limited liability company, or domestic or foreign limited partnership whose registered agent files a certificate of resignation with the State Corporation Commission pursuant to §§

13.1-636

,

13.1-765

,

13.1-835

,

13.1-927

,

13.1-1017

, or §

50-73.6

of the Code of Virginia on or after January 1, 2001.”

The 1997 amendment,

effective January 1, 1998, in the second sentence of subsection A, substituted “the last day of the fourth month immediately following its annual report due date each year” for “September 1 of the year it is due” and substituted “as of that day” for “as of September 1”; in subdivision B 1, substituted “the corporation’s annual report due date determined in accordance with subsection C of §

13.1-775

” for “April 1 (following the January assessment)” in the first sentence and substituted “after such date” for “after April 1” in the second sentence; and, in subdivision B 2, substituted “the due date” for “June 1” in the first sentence and substituted “the last day of the fourth month immediately following the due date” for “September 1” in the second sentence.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 52 added subsection C.
For applicability, see Editor’s note.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” throughout; substituted “a statement” for “his statement”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 753 rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection D, substituted “as an agent for service of process upon the foreign corporation” for “as the foreign corporation’s agent for service of process.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on business associations for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1536 (1970).

For an article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1067 (1998).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Service on registered agent with revoked/inactive status. —

It was proper to find a corporation in default because by serving the corporation’s registered agent, parents met their burden, and the corporation failed to answer; the circuit court did not have a due process duty to ensure service of process on the corporation beyond statutory service on the registered agent listed by the Virginia State Corporation Commission for it, regardless of its revoked/inactive status. Tarek El Bourini v. Home Health Connection, Inc., 104 Va. Cir. 85, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 2 (Fairfax County Jan. 3, 2020).

2019 amendment. —

Change from “the” to “an” seems like a deliberate attempt to give the serving party an extra option; in other words, the service rule is not a way of protecting the foreign corporation who violated the Virginia Stock Corporations, but instead, a way to give a plaintiff an extra option of whom to serve. Tarek El Bourini v. Home Health Connection, Inc., 104 Va. Cir. 85, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 2 (Fairfax County Jan. 3, 2020).

§ 13.1-768.1.
Repealed by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Editor’s note.

Former §

13.1-768.1

, deemed withdrawal upon domestication of a foreign corporation, derived from 2019, c. 734.

§ 13.1-769.
Involuntary revocation of certificate of authority.

The certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth of any foreign corporation may be revoked by order of the Commission when it finds that such foreign corporation:

Has continued to exceed the authority conferred upon it by law;

Has failed to maintain a registered office or a registered agent in the Commonwealth as required by law;

Has failed to file any document required by this chapter to be filed with the Commission;

No longer exists under the laws of the jurisdiction of its formation; or

Has been convicted for a violation of 8 U.S.C. § 1324a(f), as amended, for actions of its officers and directors constituting a pattern or practice of employing unauthorized aliens in the Commonwealth.A certificate of authority revoked pursuant to subdivision A 5 shall not be eligible for reinstatement for a period of not less than one year.

A foreign corporation convicted of the offense listed in subdivision A 5 shall immediately report such conviction to the Commission and file with the Commission an authenticated copy of the judgment or record of conviction.

Before entering an order revoking the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation under subsection A, the Commission shall issue a rule against the foreign corporation giving it an opportunity to be heard and show cause why such an order should not be entered. The Commission may issue the rule on its own motion or on motion of the Attorney General.

The authority of a foreign corporation to transact business in the Commonwealth ceases on the date shown on the order revoking its certificate of authority.

The Commission’s revocation of a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority appoints the clerk of the Commission as an agent of the foreign corporation for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time the foreign corporation was authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth. Service of process on the clerk of the Commission under this subsection is service on the foreign corporation and shall be made on the clerk in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

.

Revocation of a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority does not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the corporation.

History.

1985, c. 522; 1991, c. 672; 1995, c. 76; 2005, c. 765; 2008, cc. 588, 770; 2015, c. 623; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” throughout; and deleted “by virtue of dissolution, termination, merger, or consolidation” following “exists” in subdivision A 4.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 588 and 770 are identical, and added subdivision A 5 and made related changes; added subsection B; and redesignated former subsections B through E as subsections C though F.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 substituted “reinstatement” for “reentry” in subdivision A 5.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, substituted “transact” for “do,” and substituted “such foreign” for “the”; in subdivision A 4, substituted “jurisdiction of its formation” for “state or country of its incorporation”; in the second paragraph of subdivision A 5, inserted “of authority” for “certificate”; in subsection C, substituted “an order revoking the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation under subsection A” for “any such order,” and inserted “foreign” preceding “corporation”; and in subsection E, substituted “as an agent of the foreign corporation” for “the foreign corporation’s agent”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

§ 13.1-769.1.
Reinstatement of a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority that has been withdrawn or revoked.

A foreign corporation whose certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth has been withdrawn or revoked may be relieved of the withdrawal or revocation and have its certificate of authority reinstated by the Commission within five years after the date of withdrawal or revocation unless the certificate of authority was revoked by order of the Commission pursuant to subdivision A 1 of §

13.1-769

.

To have its certificate of authority reinstated, a foreign corporation shall provide the Commission with the following:

An application for reinstatement, which shall include the identification number issued by the Commission to the corporation, and which may be in the form of a letter signed by an officer or director of the corporation, or which may be by affidavit signed by an agent of any shareholder’s interests stating that after diligent search by such agent, no officer or director can be found;

A reinstatement fee of $100;

All annual registration fees and penalties that were due before the certificate of withdrawal was issued or the certificate of authority was revoked and that would have been assessed or imposed to the date of reinstatement if the corporation had not withdrawn or had its certificate of authority revoked;

An annual report for the calendar year that corresponds to the calendar year of the latest annual registration fee that was assessed or that would have been assessed to the date of reinstatement;

A duly authenticated copy of any amendments or corrections made to the articles of incorporation or other constituent documents of the foreign corporation and any merger, conversion, or domestication transaction entered into by the foreign corporation from the date of withdrawal or revocation of its certificate of authority to the date of its application for reinstatement, along with an application for an amended certificate of authority if required as a result of any such amendment, correction, or transaction and all fees required by this chapter for the filing of such instruments;

If the name of the foreign corporation does not comply with the provisions of §

13.1-762

at the time of reinstatement, an application for an amended certificate of authority to adopt a designated name for use in the Commonwealth that satisfies the requirements of §

13.1-762

, with the fee required by this chapter for the filing of an application for an amended certificate of authority; and

If the foreign corporation’s registered agent has filed a statement of resignation and a new registered agent has not been appointed, a statement of change pursuant to §

13.1-764

.

If the foreign corporation complies with the provisions of this section, the Commission shall enter an order of reinstatement, reinstating the foreign corporation’s certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth.

History.

1987, c. 431; 1988, c. 405; 2004, c. 274; 2005, c. 765; 2015, c. 623; 2019, c. 734.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 734, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 5 provides: “That until July 1, 2021, the term ‘conversion,’ when used in any provision of the first enactment of this act, shall be construed to mean ‘entity conversion.’ ”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 274, in the sixth sentence, substituted “A duly authenticated copy of any” for “Any” and inserted “and any mergers entered into by a foreign corporation”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “the clerk’s” for “his” in the fifth sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision B 5, substituted “merger, conversion, or domestication transaction” for “mergers,” and substituted “any such amendment, correction, or transaction” for “an amendment or a correction.”

Law Review.

For article, “Administrative Aspects of State Corporation Law,” see 28 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (1994).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, § 293.